Massachusetts, session 194th, H5434.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the fourth sentence of the eleventh paragraph of section 9
of chapter 40A of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the select
board and planning board of the town of Tisbury, by majority vote of the combined members of
said boards present and voting, may appoint up to two (2) associate members of the planning
board, for terms of five years. In the case of the absence, inability to act or conflict of interest on
the part of any members of the planning board of the town of Tisbury or in the event of one or
more vacancies on the planning board, the chair of the planning board may designate one or both
associate members of the planning board to sit on the planning board for the purposes of acting
on any matter under its jurisdiction including, but not limited to, a matter coming under its
jurisdiction pursuant to chapter 41 or chapter 40A of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1